California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) (1) In the case of a declaration of a disaster by the President of the United States or the Governor, if a property owner or owner’s legal representative is unable to identify the insurer of the owner’s property that is located in the declared disaster area, the commissioner shall, at the request of the property owner or owner’s legal representative, electronically provide the property owner’s name, any contact information provided to the commissioner, and property location information to insurers that issue homeowners’ insurance policies subject to Section 2071.

(2) The
 commissioner or an insurer may conclusively presume that a request submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) is a bona fide request from the property owner or owner’s legal representative. Information transmitted to the commissioner or an insurer pursuant to this section shall, within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code, constitute information provided with the voluntary written consent of the person transmitting the information and shall authorize the commissioner or an insurer to provide the information to others in accordance with this section. No reasonable expectation of privacy shall exist for the information provided to the commissioner or an insurer pursuant to this section and no cause of action shall arise nor shall any liability be imposed against the commissioner or an insurer, the commissioner’s or an insurer’s authorized representatives, or any department or
 insurer employee for statements made or conduct performed in good faith while carrying out the provisions of this section.

(3) Communication between a property owner or owner’s legal representative and the commissioner, and between the commissioner and insurers, shall not constitute the filing of a claim.

(b) An insurer that issues homeowners’ insurance policies subject to Section 2071 shall provide the commissioner with an email address for accepting an electronic transmission from the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) An insurer that issues homeowners’ insurance policies subject to Section 2071 shall respond to the property owner or owner’s
 legal representative within 90 days after receiving a transmission pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall indicate if the insurer issued a homeowners’ insurance policy on the property located in the disaster area and identified in the commissioner’s communication that was in force at the time that the disaster occurred. An insurer’s response to the property owner or owner’s legal representative pursuant to this paragraph shall not be an acknowledgment of a claim, and shall not constitute an admission of coverage under any policy for any loss.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), neither the department nor the insurer shall be required to respond to a property owner or the owner’s legal representative if the insurer determines that it did not issue a policy for the property.

(3) A response by an insurer to the property owner or the owner’s legal representative pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be provided free of charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 361, Sec. 1.   (SB 569)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reduced Wildfire Risk [2095. - 2097.]

2095.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) More than 2,000,000 California households, or approximately one in four residential structures in California, are located within or near “high” or “very high” fire hazard severity zones. These households are particularly vulnerable to increasingly catastrophic wildfires that pose urgent threats to lives, property, and resources in California.

(b) The state has invested nearly three billion dollars ($3,000,000,000) since the Budget Act of 2019 into programs and projects to improve forest health and resilience, create fuel breaks, harden homes and communities, and build resilient lifeline infrastructure to withstand wildfire disasters when they
 do occur.

(c) Chapter 391 of the Statutes of 2019, which created the California Wildfire Mitigation Program jointly administered by the Office of Emergency Services and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, recognized that “California must develop statewide options to encourage cost-effective structure hardening to create fire-resistant homes, businesses, and public buildings within wildfire hazard areas and with a focus on vulnerable communities.”

(d) State support for home hardening incentive programs is especially critical now. California residents are finding homeowners’ insurance in very high risk fire areas to be increasingly difficult and costly to obtain, if coverage is even available. The Department of Insurance determined that the majority of nonrenewals, refusals to insure, and increased premiums resulted from insurers’ use of wildfire risk models that do not
 account for wildfire risk reduction or home hardening measures completed by the homeowner or community.

(e) On September 21, 2023, Governor Newsom issued Executive Order No. N-13-23 asking the Insurance Commissioner to take “prompt regulatory action to strengthen and stabilize California’s marketplace for homeowners insurance and commercial property insurance,” including maintaining “the long-term availability of homeowners and commercial property insurance coverage.”

(f) Regular review of and updates to the Department of Insurance’s Safer from Wildfires regulations will advance these goals. The Safer from Wildfires regulations incentivize homeowners to invest in specified wildfire risk reduction and home hardening measures by requiring admitted insurers to reflect and take into account these measures in their ratings plans. The voluntary home hardening measures included in the
 Safer from Wildfires regulations provide a higher level of fire protection than what is otherwise required by state law and help contain the spread of wildfires, reduce property damage, save lives, and encourage insurance companies to remain committed to the California insurance market.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature to further incentivize homeowners to invest in demonstrably effective home hardening measures by requiring the Department of Insurance to periodically review its Safer from Wildfires regulations and consider whether or not to amend the regulations to include additional communitywide mitigation programs and building hardening measures, including use of specified noncombustible construction materials that are included by the Office of the State Fire Marshal on the Building Materials Listing. Noncombustible construction materials, as defined by the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of
 Regulations), provide the highest level of fire safety among materials included on the Building Materials Listing because these materials do not ignite, even when exposed to high temperatures for extended periods of time. Use of noncombustible construction materials is an effective means of reducing fire-related property damage and the contribution of structures to the spread of wildfires.

(h) The Building Materials Listing includes construction materials that have been tested and analyzed by a laboratory accredited by the Office of the State Fire Marshal to confirm the materials meet established performance and reliability features.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.   (AB 1)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2096.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Building Materials Listing” means the list of construction materials and equipment biennially prepared by the Office of the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 13144.1 of the Health and Safety Code as part of the Office of the State Fire Marshal’s Building Materials Listing Program.

(b) “Safer from Wildfires regulations” means the regulations set forth in Section 2644.9 of Title 10 of California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.   (AB 1)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2097.

(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the department shall consider whether to update the Safer from Wildfires regulations to include additional building hardening measures for property-level mitigation efforts and communitywide wildfire mitigation programs.

(2) If the department updates the Safer from Wildfires regulations, it shall, as a part of its first consideration, consider whether to update these regulations to include in the regulations the installation of construction materials included by the Office of the State Fire Marshal on the Building Materials Listing or in compliance with the most recent provisions of Chapter 7A of the California Building Standards Code.

(b) As part of its consideration pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall do both of the following:

(1) Consult with the Office of Emergency Services, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Public Utilities Commission, and the Office of Planning and Research to identify additional building hardening measures for property-level mitigation efforts and communitywide wildfire mitigation programs to consider.

(2) Consult with relevant stakeholders to consider potential revisions to the Safer from Wildfires regulations.

(3) Develop and implement a process that allows for meaningful public participation that includes, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) Holding at least one
 public meeting to allow interested persons to submit suggestions for additional building hardening measures for property-level mitigation efforts and communitywide wildfire mitigation programs for the department to consider.

(B) Making available for public review and comment, including during at least one public meeting, a preliminary list of building hardening measures for property-level mitigation efforts and communitywide wildfire mitigation programs being considered by the department for inclusion in the Safer from Wildfires regulations.

(C) Making available to the public a final list of building hardening measures for property-level mitigation efforts and communitywide wildfire mitigation programs the department proposes to include in the list of building hardening measures identified in the Safer from Wildfires regulations before amending the regulations pursuant to the
 rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) If the department makes public a final list of building hardening measures for property-level mitigation efforts and communitywide wildfire mitigation programs to be included in the list of building hardening measures identified in the Safer from Wildfires regulations pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the department shall initiate the Administrative Procedure Act rulemaking process to amend the Safer from Wildfires regulations within 30 days of publishing the final list.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.   (AB 1)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. General Mutual Insurers [4010. - 4097.20.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4010. - 4019.]

4010.

A “mutual” insurer is an insurance corporation without capital stock owned by its policyholders collectively, who have the right to vote in the election of its directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.

The provisions of Section 36 shall apply to domestic mutual insurers as well as foreign mutual insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4012.

Domestic mutual insurers, incorporating or qualifying to transact any or all of the classes of insurance designated in Sections 100 through 123 and 700. 01, shall be subject to all provisions of this code applicable to other incorporated insurers, except where otherwise provided. Domestic mutual insurers shall not be required to have or issue capital stock or shares nor shall they be required to distribute an annual report to a member other than at the time of the initial policy issuance or once each year on renewal. The provisions of Section 1140 shall apply to such an insurer except that the provisions of the Corporation Law referring to shareholders or members shall be applied as though such provisions referred to the policyholders or members of a mutual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 392, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4013.

(a) Each policyholder of a domestic mutual insurer, other than the holder of a reinsurance contract, is a member of the insurer during the policy period, as defined in the policy or the declarations page of the policy, with all rights and obligations of that membership, and the policy shall so specify.

(b) A “tail” or extended reporting policy or endorsement permitting claims to be reported after the expiration or termination of the policy period shall not extend the policy period of a “claims made” policy and all rights and obligations of membership shall cease upon the expiration or termination of the policy period. If an insurer has allowed or does allow, by contract, conduct, or otherwise, the holder of a “tail” or extended reporting policy or endorsement to have privileges, in whole or in part, identical, or similar to some or all of the rights of membership, the holder is nevertheless not deemed a member.

(c) Subdivision (b) and the modifications to subdivision (a) made by the act adding this subdivision, are declaratory of existing law and do not affect any existing contract rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 255, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4014.

Any person, government or governmental agency, state or political subdivision thereof, public or private corporation, board, association, estate, trustee or fiduciary may be a policyholder member of a mutual insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4015.

With respect to the management, records, and affairs of a domestic mutual insurer qualified to transact any or all of the classes of insurance designated in Section 700.01, and except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a member of such mutual insurer shall have the same character of rights and relationship as a stockholder has toward a domestic stock insurer subject to the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 824.)
-------------------------------------------

4016.

Each member of a domestic mutual insurer is entitled to one vote upon each matter coming to a vote at meetings of members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4016.1.

Notice of all meetings of members whether annual or special shall be given in writing to the members entitled to vote by the secretary, or an assistant secretary, or other persons charged with that duty, or if there be no such officer, or in case of his or her neglect or refusal, by any director or member. At the option of the insurer the notice may be imprinted on premium notices or receipts or on both.

A notice may be given by the insurer to any member either personally, or by mail, or other means of written communication, charges prepaid, addressed to the member at his or her address appearing on the books of the insurer, or given by him or her to the insurer for the purpose of notice. If a member gives no address, notice shall be deemed to have been given him or her if sent by mail or other means of written communication addressed to the place where the principal office of the insurer is situated, or if published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the office is located.

Notice of any meeting of members shall be sent to each member entitled thereto not less than seven days before a meeting, unless the bylaws provide otherwise. 

Notice of any meeting of members shall specify the place, the day, and the hour of the meeting and the general nature of the business to be transacted.

Notice of an annual meeting to be held at the time and place specified shall be sufficiently given if published at least once in each of four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office of the insurer is located, and if so published no other notice of the meeting shall be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4016.2.

(a) The presence in person or by proxy of 5 percent of the members of a domestic mutual insurer entitled to vote at any meeting shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business of the insurer, including but not limited to, the amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the insurer, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of such insurer.

(b) Any required member approval shall be by the affirmative vote of a number of members which, as to a stock corporation, would constitute approval of the shareholders (Section 153 of the Corporations Code) rather than approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152 of the Corporations Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   Effective May 5, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

4017.

A member shall have the right to vote in person or by his written proxy filed with the corporate secretary not less than five days prior to the meeting. No such proxy shall be made irrevocable, nor be valid beyond the earliest of the following dates:

(a) The date of expiration set forth in the proxy; or

(b) The date of termination of membership; or

(c) Eleven months from the date of execution of the proxy; or

(d) Such time as may be specified in the bylaws, not to exceed eleven months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 209, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4018.

No member’s vote upon any proposal to divest the insurer of its business or assets, or the major part thereof, shall be registered or taken except in person or by proxy newly executed and specific as to the matter to be voted upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4019.

This chapter does not apply to a mutual insurer that has converted to a mutual legal reserve insurer pursuant to former Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10810) of Part 2 of Division 2. Except for Section 4016.2, this chapter does not apply to (a) a mutual insurer that has completed proceedings for voluntary mutualization pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 11525) of Part 2 or (b) a stock life insurer that has converted from a mutual life insurer, or a mutual holding company or a stock holding company formed, pursuant to proceedings under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 11535) of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Directors [4020. - 4023.]

4020.

The affairs of every domestic mutual insurer shall be managed by a board of directors consisting of not less than 5 directors nor more than 15 directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4021.

Directors shall be elected by the members of a domestic mutual insurer at the annual meeting of members. Directors may be elected for terms of not more than five years each and until their successors are elected and have qualified, and if to be elected for terms of more than one year, the insurer’s bylaws shall provide for a staggered term system under which the terms of a proportionate part of the number of the board of directors shall expire on the date of each annual meeting of members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4022.

A director of a mutual insurer shall be a policyholder thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.

As to an insurer operating as an authorized insurer only in the State of California, a majority of the members of the insurer’s board of directors shall be citizens of and shall actually reside in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Management and Exclusive Agency Contracts [4030. - 4034.]

4030.

A domestic mutual insurer shall not hereafter make any contract whereby any person is granted or is to enjoy in fact the management of the insurer to the substantial exclusion of its board of directors or to have the controlling or preemptive right to produce substantially all insurance business for the insurer, unless the contract is filed with and approved by the commissioner. That contract shall not be effective unless and until approved by the insurance commissioner. That approval shall be obtained by filing application for approval with the commissioner accompanied by a one-hundred-fifty-dollar ($150) fee. Any disapproval shall be delivered to the insurer in writing, stating the grounds therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 51.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4031.

Any such contract shall provide that any such manager or producer of its business shall within 90 days after expiration of each calendar year furnish the insurer’s board of directors a written statement of amounts received under or on account of the contract and amounts expended thereunder during such calendar year, including the emoluments received therefrom by the respective directors, officers, and other principal management personnel of the manager or producer, and with such classification of items and further detail as the insurer’s board of directors may reasonably require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4032.

The commissioner shall disapprove any such contract if he finds that it:

(a) Subjects the insurer to excessive charges; or

(b) Is to extend for an unreasonable length of time; or

(c) Does not contain fair and adequate standards of performance; or

(d) Contains other inequitable provisions or provisions which impair the proper interests of policyholders of the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4033.

The commissioner may, after a hearing held thereon, withdraw his approval of any such contract theretofore approved by him, if he finds that the bases of his original approval no longer exist, or that the contract has, in actual operation, shown itself to be subject to disapproval on any of the grounds referred to in Section 4032 above.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4034.

The holder of any such contract described in this Article shall be subject to examination by the commissioner pursuant to Article 4 (beginning with Section 730), Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Loans [4040. - 4044.]

4040.

A mutual insurer may borrow money to defray the expenses of its organization, provide it with surplus funds, or for any purpose of its business, upon a written agreement that the money is required to be repaid only out of the insurer’s surplus in excess of that stipulated in the agreement. The agreement may provide for fixed or variable interest not exceeding an amount allowed by the commissioner, which interest shall or shall not constitute a liability of the insurer as to its funds other than the excess that is stipulated in the agreement. Any agreement of this type shall provide that all interest payments and principal repayments require prior approval by the commissioner. Unless otherwise approved by the commissioner, written agreements evidencing this borrowed money shall not be issued in units of less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Unless otherwise allowed by the commissioner, no commission or promotion expense shall be paid in connection with any loan of this type. An agreement to borrow money to provide surplus funds, or for any business purpose, may be termed a surplus note. No surplus note or other agreement may be issued unless it conforms to the requirements set forth at the time the note is issued in the Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners for the reporting of agreements as surplus and not as debt in the financial statements required to be filed by an insurer with the commissioner. No permit or other agreement shall constitute authorization or approval for any other issuance of securities that is connected to the note or agreement in any way.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 4, Sec. 2.   Effective January 21, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4042.

The issuance of any document evidencing any such loan shall require the commissioner’s securities permit under Article 8 of Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1 (commencing with Section 820).

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4044.

This section shall not apply to loans obtained by the insurer in ordinary course of business from banks and other financial institutions, nor to loans secured by pledge or mortgage of assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Dividends to Policyholders [4050. - 4052.]

4050.

The directors of a domestic mutual insurer may from time to time apportion and pay or credit to its members dividends only out of that part of its surplus funds which represents net realized savings, net realized earnings, and net realized capital gains, all in excess of a surplus equivalent to the aggregate of paid-in capital and unassigned surplus required by this code for the issuance of a certificate of authority to a capital stock insurer transacting the same classes of insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4051.

A dividend otherwise proper may be payable out of such savings, earnings, and gains even though the insurer’s total surplus is then less than the aggregate of contributed surplus remaining unpaid by the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.

The payment of any such dividends on a workers’ compensation policy shall be subject to the provisions of Section 11738 and for that purpose a mutual policy shall be considered to be a participating policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 231, Sec. 13.   (AB 2045)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Nonassessable Policies [4060. - 4064.]

4060.

A domestic mutual insurer while maintaining unimpaired surplus funds not less in amount than one and one-half times the minimum paid-in capital stock required of a domestic stock insurer formed under this code for authority to transact the same class or classes of insurance, may, upon receipt of the commissioner’s certificate so authorizing, extinguish the contingent liability to assessment of its members as to all its policies in force and may omit provisions imposing contingent liability in all policies currently issued. A fee of two hundred eighty-three dollars ($283) shall accompany any application for that certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 52.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4061.

The commissioner shall not authorize a domestic insurer to extinguish the contingent liability of any of its members or in any of its policies to be issued, unless it qualifies to and does extinguish such liability of all its members and in all such policies for all kinds of insurance transacted by it. No assessment shall be levied against any member or subscriber with respect to any nonassessable policy issued when the insurer had an unrevoked certificate to issue nonassessable policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4062.

A foreign or alien mutual insurer may issue nonassessable policies to its members in this State pursuant to its charter and the laws of its domicile.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4063.

The commissioner shall revoke the certificate of a domestic mutual insurer to issue policies without contingent liability if

(a) At any time the insurer’s assets are less than the sum of its liabilities and the surplus required for such certificate, or

(b) The insurer, by resolution of its board of directors approved by a majority of its members, requests that the certificate be revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4064.

During the absence of such certificate the insurer shall not issue any policy without providing therein for the contingent liability of the policyholder, nor renew any policy which is then in force without endorsing the same to provide for such contingent liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Insolvency [4070. - 4070.]

4070.

Such an insurer is insolvent if its surplus becomes less than the amount of paid-in capital required of a capital stock company to qualify to transact the same classes of insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Applicable Insurance Laws [4080. - 4081.]

4080.

Such an insurer shall be subject to all the provisions of this code and all the applicable rules and regulations of the commissioner. Such code provisions and such rules and regulations, when applied to such insurers, shall be construed in accordance with the fundamental nature of a mutual insurer. In the event of any direct conflicts between such code provisions and the provisions of this chapter, the latter shall prevail. Such other code provisions may, however, be used to supplement or explain the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1772.)
-------------------------------------------

4081.

Any county mutual fire insurer, or two or more such insurers, may merge into a general mutual insurer described in this chapter by following the procedure in Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 7040) of Chapter 5, Part 1, Division 2 of this code. Such general mutual insurer shall become the surviving corporation.

In addition, by following the above-mentioned procedure any two or more county mutual fire insurers may merge, concurrently with the transformation of one of them into a general mutual insurer described herein, as provided in Section 7044. 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 455.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Merger, Consolidation, Reinsurance, or Transfer of Assets and Liabilities [4090. - 4096.]

4090.

By following the procedure specified in this article, any domestic mutual insurer described in this article may merge, consolidate, or otherwise unite with or become a part of, or may reinsure all of its policies with and, upon assumption of all of its liabilities, may transfer all of its assets to, another insurer, domestic or foreign. Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code and Article 1 (commencing with Section 11535) of Chapter 14 of Part 2 of Division 2 do not apply to any such transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4091.

The plan and agreement by which any such transaction is to be effected shall be approved by a resolution of the majority of the board of directors of each domestic mutual insurer reciting the reasons for and the purposes of the proposed transaction and the manner in which the transaction is expected to benefit and serve the best interests of the domestic mutual insurer and its members. The plan and agreement shall thereafter be submitted to the commissioner, who shall examine the same and require such provisions to be inserted in the agreement and such actions to be taken in connection with the transaction including, but not limited to the following:

(a) The terms and conditions of the transaction.

(b) Any fee, commission, or other valuable consideration whatsoever, other than regular salary and compensation paid to any director, officer, agent, or employee of the domestic mutual insurer in connection with the transaction.

(c) At the expense of the applicant, an opinion as to the fairness of the terms of the plan and an appraisal of the fair value of each insurer, together with the respective equity interests of the members therein, by one or more qualified disinterested persons appointed by the domestic mutual insurer with the approval of the commissioner unless the commissioner finds that such an opinion or appraisal is not necessary to protect the interests of current members of the domestic mutual insurer.

(d) The contents of the notice of the vote on the transaction by the members of each domestic mutual insurer that is a party thereto.

(e) The manner and form of voting thereon by the members of each such domestic mutual insurer.

(f) Any other change as the commissioner may deem necessary in order that the transaction may be fair, just, and equitable to the parties to the transaction and their respective policyholders, owners, creditors, and the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4092.

When any such plan and agreement shall have been approved by the commissioner, with any changes required by him, the same shall be approved in the case of each domestic mutual insurer that is a party to the transaction by not less than two-thirds of the votes cast by the members thereof represented in person or by proxy at a meeting called to consider the same. At least 30 days before the day fixed for the meeting, notice of such meeting and its purpose shall be given to the members at their addresses appearing on the books maintained at the home office of the insurer. With respect to members whose addresses do not appear on such books of the insurer, notice shall be deemed to have been given if published at least once in some newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office of the insurer is located. At such meeting the presence in person or by proxy of 10 percent of such members of such insurer shall constitute a quorum. In the absence of a quorum the members present at the meeting in person or by proxy may adjourn the meeting to a later date. No further notice need be given of the date to which the meeting is adjourned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 824.)
-------------------------------------------

4093.

If the vote is in the affirmative, a certified copy of all proceedings relating to the proposed transaction shall be filed with the commissioner. If one of the insurers that is a party to the transaction is a foreign corporation there shall also be filed with the commissioner evidence of an approval, consent, or authorization as may be required by the laws of the state of incorporation of the foreign insurer. If the commissioner finds that the proceedings have been in accordance with the law and the commissioner’s requirements, he or she shall issue a certificate approving the plan and agreement and the transaction shall become effective when the certificate, the agreement, and any other documents required by law have been filed with the Secretary of State.

The fee for
 issuing the certificate approving the transaction shall be six thousand three hundred fifty dollars ($6,350), payable in advance with the filing with the commissioner of the first papers relating to the proposed transaction; eight dollars ($8) shall be charged for each signed and sealed or certified copy thereof issued as part of the same transaction in which the original certificate is issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 53.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4094.

Any plan of merger, consolidation, or other unification under this article shall provide that all rights and properties of the parties to the plan of merger, consolidation or other unification shall accrue to and become the rights and properties of the surviving or consolidated or continuing corporation which shall succeed to and assume all the obligations and liabilities of the merged, consolidating, or transferring corporation in the same manner as if incurred or contracted by the surviving, consolidated, or continuing corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 824.)
-------------------------------------------

4095.

In the event a mutual insurer is merged, consolidated, or part of a reorganization under the procedures specified in this article, and the surviving, consolidated, or continuing company is an incorporated stock insurer, the plan shall provide for the manner of converting or exchanging the equity interests of current members in the domestic mutual insurer into shares, subscription rights, warrants, options, cash, dividends, premium credits, certificates of contribution, or any other interests that may be provided in the plan. However, notwithstanding the foregoing, the equity interest of a policyholder in the mutual insurer may be converted or exchanged solely into premium credits if the plan and agreement shall so provide, but only at the policyholder’s election. Any person holding a subscription note or other debt instrument evidencing a capital contribution to the domestic mutual insurer shall be entitled upon demand to have the note or debt instrument redeemed for cash or securities as provided in the plan. The plan may provide for additional securities to be sold to directors, officers, employees, and former members of the domestic mutual insurer in accordance with the provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1. Nothing in this section shall preclude the issuance of different securities, subject to the approval of the commissioner, provided that comparable securities shall be issued at prices not less than the conversion or exchange values of any such securities distributed to current policyholders. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, conversion or exchange constitutes full payment and discharge of the members’ property interest in the domestic mutual insurer and the members have no other rights with respect thereto, except for rights relating to a continuing debt or equity interest that a former member holds in the surviving insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4096.

In the event a domestic mutual insurer is merged, consolidated, or a part of a reorganization under the procedures specified in this article, and the surviving, consolidated, or continuing company is a nonadmitted insurer, the plan of merger shall provide either for that insurer to be admitted to transact insurance in California or for any nonsurviving insurer admitted in California to withdraw from the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 728, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------


